California, session 20252026, AB2102.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 4138) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read: Article 3.5. Force State and Local Government to Be Firewise Neighbors Act4138. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Force State and Local Government to Be Firewise Neighbors Act.4138.5. For purposes of this article, the following terms shall apply:(a) “Fire break” means a gap in vegetation or other combustible material that acts as a barrier to slow or stop brush fire or wildfire.(b) “Local entity” means a city, county, city or county, or other local jurisdiction with fire prevention and suppression authority.(c) “Public land” means undeveloped land under the control of the department or a local entity.(d) “Severe fire hazard” means land designated as a moderate, high, or very high fire hazard severity zone as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 4202 of this code and Section 51178 of the Government Code or as identified by a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code.4139. (a) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and every two years thereafter, the department or a local entity shall conduct an assessment on all public lands for which it is primarily responsible for preventing and suppressing fires pursuant Sections 4102 and 4125 to ensure that the public land is not a severe fire hazard.(2) The assessment shall include all of the following:(A) Information on the vegetation management plan, including, but not limited to, what and how often vegetation management is currently being done.(B) Information on the cost of vegetation management described in subparagraph (A).(b) The department and the local entity shall post the assessment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on its respective internet website. If a local entity prepares the assessment, the local entity shall also submit its assessment to the department.4139.5. (a) When the department or a local entity acquires private undeveloped land, the department or a local entity that is primarily responsible for preventing and suppressing fires pursuant to Section 4125 shall, within one year of acquisition, do both of the following:(1) Create a plan on how the land will be managed with regard to fire prevention.(2) Report the cost of keeping the land managed.(b) The department or the local entity shall post the information pursuant to subdivision (a) on its respective internet website. If a local entity prepares the information, the local entity shall also submit this information to the department.4140. On or before January 1, 2028, all public lands shall have a 200 foot fire break on all borders with privately owned land.SEC. 2. Part 5 (commencing with Section 4970) is added to Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read:PART 5. Wildfire Fuel Reduction4970. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a property owner may, by right, conduct wildfire fuel reduction activities on their private property if those activities comply with the guidelines established pursuant to Section 4971.(b) For purposes of this section, “wildfire fuel reduction activities” include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(1) Removal of dead, dying, diseased, or hazardous trees.(2) Removal or thinning of brush, chaparral, shrubs, and grasses.(3) Thinning of trees to reduce ladder fuels and canopy density.(4) Creation and maintenance of defensible space and fuel breaks.(5) Removal of invasive plant species that increase fire risk.(6) Maintenance of emergency access routes and firebreaks.(c) Wildfire fuel reduction activities pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) pursuant to Section 21080.36. (d) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency, including, but not limited to, the State Air Resources Board or its successor entity, shall not impose additional permitting, emissions limitation, or regulatory requirements on activities conducted pursuant to this section.4971. (a) Guidelines governing wildfire fuel reduction activities pursuant to Section 4970, shall be established by the fire chief of a county with jurisdiction over the property or the fire chief’s designee, as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).(b) The guidelines may include objective standards relating to, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Maximum slope disturbance.(2) Erosion and sediment control measures.(3) Seasonal timing restrictions for fire safety.(4) Disposal or treatment of removed vegetation.(5) Protection of critical infrastructure and evacuation routes.(c) The guidelines shall be all of the following:(1) Objective and uniformly applicable within the jurisdiction.(2) Published and publicly accessible.(3) Limited to matters directly related to wildfire risk and fire suppression effectiveness.4972. (a) This part shall preempt any local ordinance, regulation, or policy that prohibits or materially restricts wildfire fuel reduction activities conducted in compliance with this part.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, or special district shall not impose discretionary review, conditional use permits, or additional environmental review requirements for activities authorized by this part.SEC. 3. Section 21080.36 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.36. This division shall not apply to wildfire fuel reduction activities pursuant to Section 4970 regardless of the acreage involved, if the activity is conducted solely for wildfire fuel reduction and not for development purposes. SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code. However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.